adj.lexd
PATTERNS
# склоняются по 1-склонению имен существительных
Stem [<adj>:] [<abs>] Number
Stem [<adj>:] Erg (AdjInfl) | (AdjInflEssive (Elative | Directive)?)

LEXICON Stem
чал # сивый
куьлуь # мелкий

LEXICON Number
<sg>:ди
<pl>:бур
  
LEXICON Erg
<erg>:да
<erg><pl>:буру

LEXICON AdjInfl
<dat>:з
<gen>:н

LEXICON Elative
<elative>:ай

LEXICON Directive
<directive>:ди

LEXICON AdjInflEssive
<ad><essive>:в
<post><essive>:хъ
<sub><essive>:к
<in><essive>:а
<super><essive>:л
